Maine, session 132, LD1007.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1599-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Informed consent for drug-induced abortion. In addition to providing the woman
with the information in subsection 2, if an abortion will be performed using any drug or
combination of drugs, referred to in this subsection as a "drug-induced abortion," the health
care professional shall:
A. Inform the woman, in a manner that in the health care professional's professional
judgment is not misleading and that will be understood by the patient, of at least the
following:
(1) It may be possible to reverse the effects of the drug-induced abortion if the
woman changes her mind, but time is of the essence; and
(2) Initial studies suggest that there is no increased risk of maternal mortality after
reversing the effects of a drug-induced abortion and that children born after
reversing the effects of a drug-induced abortion have no greater risk of birth defects
than the general population; and
B. Read the following statement and provide a written copy of the following statement
to the woman: "Information on the potential ability of qualified health care
professionals to reverse the effects of an abortion obtained through the use of abortion-
inducing drugs is available by visiting [insert publicly accessible website address
provided by Department of Health and Human Services], a publicly accessible website
that provides information regarding abortion pill reversal or contacting [insert phone
number provided by Department of Health and Human Services], an abortion pill
reversal helpline for assistance in locating a health care professional who can aid in the
reversal of an abortion." The department shall provide and update, at least annually,
the website and helpline phone number that must be included in this required statement.